District of Columbia statutes.
43-129

Repealed

Cremation required in certain cases.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 123, ch. 1641, § 1
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2919(c), 47 DCR 6308
1981 Ed., § 27-129.
1973 Ed., § 27-129.
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 2919(c) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2919(c) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).